src/fst/affixes/pronouns.lexc
LEXICON indefattr
+Attr:0 K ;


! Multiword indefinites
! - - - - - - - - - - -

!LEXICON indefmulti !SUB added this lexicon, because otherwise these would be in indefattr - this moved again
!feara% mii+Pron+Indef+Sg+Nom:feara% mij K-son ;
!feara% mii+Pron+Indef+Sg+Acc:feara% májd9 K-son ;
!feara% gii+Pron+Indef+Sg+Nom:feara% gij K-son ;
!feara% mii+Pron+Indef:feara% ma oblintercas ;
!feara% gii+Pron+Indef:feara% gea oblintercas ;
!feara% makkár+Pron+Indef+Err/Orth:feara% makkár DAKKAR ;
!
!vaikko% mii+Pron+Indef+Sg+Nom:vaikko% mij K-son ;
!vaikko% mii+Pron+Indef+Sg+Acc:vaikko% májd9 K-son ;
!vaikko% gii+Pron+Indef+Sg+Nom:vaikko% gij K-son ;
!vaikko% mii+Pron+Indef:vaikko% ma oblintercas ;
!vaikko% gii+Pron+Indef:vaikko% gea oblintercas ;
!vaikko% makkár+Pron+Indef:vaikko% makkár DAKKAR ;
!vaikko% guh0te+Pron+Interr:vaikko% guhºte GUHTECASE ;
!vaikko% guhtemuš+Pron+Interr:vaikko% guđemužž GUHTEMUŠCASE ;
!vaikko% goabbá+Pron+Interr:vaikko% goabbá GUHTECASE ;
!
!
!! some multiword prons, according to Nickel
!!feara% mii iind ;
!!feara% gii iind ;
!mii% nu:mii% nu iind ;
!man% nu:man% nu iind ;
!maid% nu:maid% nu iind ;
!masa% nu:masa% nu iind ;
!mas% nu:mas% nu iind ;
!mainna% nu:mainna% nu iind ;
!manin% nu:manin% nu iind ;
!gii% nu:gii% nu iind ;
!gean% nu:gean% nu iind ;
!geasa% nu:geasa% nu iind ;
!geas% nu:geas% nu iind ;
!geainna% nu:geainna% nu iind ;
!geanin% nu:geanin% nu iind ;
!makkár% nu:makkár% nu iind ;
!makkáraš% nu:makkáraš% nu iind ;






! Separate lexica for exceptional entries
! - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - -




LEXICON indefdeclplcontr ! so far guktot
+Pl+Nom:%>t K ;
+Pl+Gen:%>jd9 K ;
+Pl+Com+Attr:%>jd9 K ;
+Pl+Ill+Attr:%>jd9 K ;
+Pl+Loc+Attr:%>jd9 K ;
!+Pl+Gen+Use/-Spell:%>jd9# NAMAT ;
+Pl+Acc:%>jd9 K ;
+Pl+Ill:%>jde K ;
+Pl+Loc:%>jn K ;
+Sg+Com:%>jn K ;

LEXICON EARRAS
+Sg+Acc:%>a K ;
+Sg+Gen:%>a K ;
+Sg+Ill:%>ij K ;
+Sg+Loc:%>is K ;
+Sg+Loc+South+Err/Orth:%>in K ; ! !SOUTH
+Sg+Com:%>iin K ;
+Ess:%>in K ;
+Pl+Nom:%>at K ;
+Pl+Gen:%>ijd9 K ;
+Pl+Acc:%>ijd9 K ;
+Pl+Ill:%>ijdda K ;
+Pl+Loc:%>ijn K ;
+Pl+Com:%>ijgujn K ;


LEXICON SEAMMA
+Sg+Nom: K ;
+Sg+Acc: K ;
+Sg+Gen: K ;
!+Sg+Gen+Err/Orth:# NAMAT ; !
+Sg+Ill:%>j K ;  ! Let's await the verdict of the jury..
! +Sg+Loc:%>s K ; ! Let's settle for the Adv reading
+Sg+Loc+South+Err/Orth:%>n K ;  ! !SOUTH, well..., probably this one should Adv as well
+Ess:%>n K ;  ! !SOUTH, well..., probably this one should Adv as well
+Sg+Com:%>jn K ; ! Let's await the verdict of the jury..
+Pl+Nom:%>t K ;
+Pl+Acc:%>jd9 K ;
+Pl+Gen:%>jd9 K ;
!+Pl+Gen+Err/Orth:%>jd9# NAMAT ; !

LEXICON SIMME !SUB
+Sg+Nom: K ;
+Sg+Acc: K ;
+Sg+Gen: K ;
+Sg+Ill:%>j K ;
+Sg+Loc:%>n K ;
+Sg+Com:%>jn K ;
+Pl+Nom:%>t K ;
+Pl+Acc:%>jd9 K ;
+Pl+Gen:%>jd9 K ;
!+Pl+Gen+Use/-Spell:%>jd9# NAMAT ;



LEXICON JUOGA
+Sg+Nom:ga K ;
+Sg+Acc:ga K ;
+Sg+Acc+Use/NG:jdá K ;
+Pl+Acc:jdá%>jd9 K ;
+Sg+Acc+Err/Orth:jddá K ; !
+Sg+Acc+Err/Orth:jda K ; !
+Sg+Acc+Err/Orth:jaaájd9 K ; !
+Sg+Gen:ga K ;
!+Sg+Gen+Use/-Spell:ga# NAMAT ;
+Sg+Ill:sa%>t K ;
+Sg+Loc:stá K ;
+Sg+Com:jdá%>jn K ;
+Ess:jdá%>n K ;
+Ess+Use/NG:ni%>n K ;
+Attr+Err/Orth:da K ; !

LEXICON OVTTAHAT
+Sg+Acc:g%>a K ;
+Sg+Gen:g%>a K ;
!+Sg+Gen+Use/-Spell:t# NAMAT ;
+Sg+Ill:hk%>ii K ;
+Sg+Loc:g%>as K ;
+Sg+Com:g%>ajn K ;
+Ess:hk%>an K ;
+Pl+Nom:g%>at K ;
+Pl+Acc:g%>ajd9 K ;
+Pl+Gen:g%>ajd9 K ;
+Pl+Ill:g%>ajde K ;
+Pl+Loc:g%>ajn K ;
+Pl+Com:g%>ajgujn K ;
